Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 122. JURORS RIGHT TO REEMPLOYMENT

Text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 234 (S.B. 370), Sec. 1

For text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 356 (H.B. 504), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 122.001.

Sec. 122.001. PROTECTION OF JURORS' EMPLOYMENT; JUROR'S RIGHT TO REEMPLOYMENT; NOTICE OF INTENT TO RETURN. (a) An employer may not discharge, threaten to discharge, intimidate, or coerce any permanent employee because the employee serves as a juror, or for the employee's attendance or scheduled attendance in connection with the service, in any court in the United States.

(b) An employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, intimidated, or coerced in violation of this section is entitled to return to the same employment that the employee held when summoned for jury service if the employee, as soon as practical after release from jury service, gives the employer actual notice that the employee intends to return.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 234 (S.B. 370), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 356 (H.B. 504), Sec. 1

For text of section as amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 234 (S.B. 370), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 122.001.

Sec. 122.001. JUROR'S RIGHT TO REEMPLOYMENT; NOTICE OF INTENT TO RETURN. (a) A private employer may not terminate the employment of a permanent employee because the employee serves as a juror or grand juror.

(b) An employee whose employment is terminated in violation of this section is entitled to return to the same employment that the employee held when summoned for jury or grand jury service if the employee, as soon as practical after release from that service, gives the employer actual notice that the employee intends to return.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 356 (H.B. 504), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 122.002. DAMAGES; REINSTATEMENT; ATTORNEY'S FEES. (a) A person who is injured because of a violation of this chapter is entitled to reinstatement to the person's former position and to damages in an amount not less than an amount equal to one year's compensation nor more than an amount equal to five years' compensation at the rate at which the person was compensated when summoned for jury or grand jury service.

(b) The injured person is also entitled to reasonable attorney's fees in an amount approved by the court.

(c) An action for damages brought by a person under Subsection (a) must be brought not later than the second anniversary of the date on which the person served as a juror or grand juror.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 770, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 356 (H.B. 504), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 122.0021. CRIMINAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates Section 122.001.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 770, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 122.0022. CONTEMPT. In addition to and without limiting any other sanction or remedy available under this chapter or other law, a court may punish by contempt an employer who terminates, threatens to terminate, penalizes, or threatens to penalize an employee because the employee performs jury or grand jury duty.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 770, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 356 (H.B. 504), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 122.003. DEFENSE. (a) It is a defense to an action brought under this chapter that the employer's circumstances changed while the employee served as a juror or grand juror so that reemployment was impossible or unreasonable.

(b) To establish a defense under this section, an employer must prove that the termination of employment was because of circumstances other than the employee's service as a juror or grand juror.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 442, Sec. 6, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 356 (H.B. 504), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.